Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-1449
New recreational vehicles; distribution; manner; request for information.

(1) When a manufacturer distributes new recreational vehicles to any dealer under the terms of a manufacturer-dealer agreement, such distribution shall be in a fair and equitable manner.

(2) Any such dealer may request information on the manner of distribution from such manufacturer. Such request shall be made in writing and delivered to the headquarters of the manufacturer. Upon receipt of such request, such manufacturer shall provide such information to the headquarters of the dealer in written form within thirty business days after receipt of such request.

Laws 2026, LB972, § 8.
October 1, 2026